Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2353.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6123XS (2) 91 lh/jh S.F. 2353 Section 1. Section 384.84, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 9A. A city or city utility shall not 3 assess, certify, or collect unpaid utility charges as a lien 4 against real property if the utility service was provided to 5 a tenant who, under a rental agreement, was responsible for 6 payment of the utility charges. 7 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 562A.9A Tenant responsibility for 8 utility charges ââ enforcement. 9 1. For purposes of this section, âutilityâ means a public, 10 municipal, or cooperative owned system that provides water, 11 sewer, sanitary sewer, storm water, electric, natural gas, or 12 other similar utility service to residential rental property. 13 2. If a utility service account is established in the name 14 of a tenant, or if a rental agreement provides that the tenant 15 is responsible for payment of utility charges, the landlord 16 shall not be liable for any unpaid utility charges incurred by 17 the tenant. 18 3. A utility shall not do any of the following to collect 19 unpaid utility charges incurred by a tenant: 20 a. Bill, charge, or seek payment from the landlord. 21 b. Transfer or attempt to transfer an unpaid balance to an 22 account of the landlord. 23 c. Condition the initiation, continuation, or restoration of 24 utility service to the premises on payment by the landlord. 25 d. File, record, certify, or threaten to file, record, or 26 certify a lien, assessment, or other encumbrance against the 27 landlordâs real property. 28 e. Use any indirect act or practice intended to compel 29 payment by the landlord. 30 4. A utility shall maintain separate billing and collection 31 accounts for tenants who are responsible for payment of utility 32 charges and shall pursue collection solely against the tenant. 33 5. A utility that violates this section is subject to 34 a civil penalty of not less than five hundred dollars and 35 -1- LSB 6123XS (2) 91 lh/jh 1/ 4 S.F. 2353 not more than five thousand dollars for each violation. 1 Each billing statement, collection notice, lien filing, 2 certification, or other collection attempt constitutes a 3 separate violation. 4 6. A landlord aggrieved by a violation of this section may 5 bring a civil action to recover any of the following: 6 a. Actual damages. 7 b. Statutory damages of one thousand dollars for each 8 violation. 9 c. Injunctive or declaratory relief. 10 d. Reasonable attorney fees and court costs. 11 7. If a lien, assessment, or certification is filed or 12 recorded in violation of this section, the utility shall 13 release the lien or assessment within ten days after receipt of 14 written notice from the landlord. Failure to timely release 15 the lien or assessment constitutes a separate violation of this 16 section. 17 8. The attorney general may enforce this section as an 18 unlawful practice under section 714.16 and may seek civil 19 penalties, restitution, and injunctive relief. 20 Sec. 3. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to utility 21 billing, collection activity, lien filings, certifications, and 22 enforcement actions occurring on or after the effective date of 23 this Act, regardless of when the rental agreement was executed. 24